District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Parking Enforcement Modernization Technical Correction Temporary
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 401(a) of the Fraudulent Vehicle Tag and Parking Enforcement
Modernization Amendment Act of 2024, effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325, 72 DCR
1284), is amended by striking the phrase “Sections 113, 114(b) and 201(c)(2) shall apply” and
inserting the phrase “Section 201(c)(2) shall apply” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2